District of Columbia statutes.
10-509.03

Penalty for violation of rules and regulations.

Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any rule or regulation prescribed under this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned not more than 6 months or both.

July 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 488, ch. 508, § 3

History

1981 Ed., § 9-132.
1973 Ed., § 9-136.

Prior Codifications